Louisiana, session 2026, HB413.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 22:1454(B)(5) is hereby amended and reenacted and
R.S. 22:1454(B)(6) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1454. Rating standards and methods
* * *
B. In determining whether rates are excessive, inadequate, or unfairly
discriminatory, consideration may be given to the following items:
* * *
(5) Claims on other lines. Insurers shall not include a rating factor in an
automobile insurance rate filing that is based solely on loss experience arising from
a catastrophe or natural disaster that only affected other lines of insurance. However,
this Paragraph does not preclude an insurer from including such a rating factor in a
multi-line policy.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 413 ENROLLED
(6) Other relevant factors. Any other factors available at the time of the rate
filing, including but not limited to rates computed in accordance with accepted
actuarial standards.
* * *
Section 2. This Act shall become effective on January 1, 2027.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.